Illinois, session 104th, HB2758.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-6 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/3-6)7    Sec. 3-6. Voting and registration age. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 9who is 17 years old on the date of a caucus, general primary 10election, or consolidated primary election and who is 11otherwise qualified to vote is qualified to vote at that 12caucus, general primary, or consolidated primary, including 13voting a vote by mail, grace period, or early voting ballot 14with respect to that general primary or consolidated primary, 15if that person will be 18 years old on the date of the 16immediately following general election or consolidated 17election for which candidates are nominated at that primary.18    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 19who is otherwise qualified to vote may preregister to vote on 20or after that person's 16th birthday, with the registration 21application held in abeyance by the State Board of Elections 22until that individual attains the required age to vote, at 23which time the State Board of Elections shall transmit the   HB2758- 2 -LRB104 08411 SPS 18462 b1registration application to the applicable election authority. 2Preregistration under this subsection (b) shall be completed 3using the online voter registration system, as provided in 4Section 1A-16.5, or an electronic voter registration portal 5with an automatic voter registration agency, as provided in 6Section 1A-16.7, or a paper application provided by the State 7Board of Elections. If an election authority receives a paper 8application for preregistration as provided in this 9subsection, it shall promptly forward the application to the 10State Board of Elections for processing in accordance with 11this Code.12    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an 13individual who is 17 years of age, will be 18 years of age on 14the date of the immediately following general or consolidated 15election, and is otherwise qualified to vote shall be deemed 16eligible to circulate a nominating petition or a petition 17proposing a public question.18    (d) For the purposes of this Code, a person who is 16 years 19of age or older shall be deemed competent to execute and attest 20to any voter registration forms. 21    (e) References in this Code and elsewhere to the 22requirement that a person must be 18 years old to vote shall be 23interpreted in accordance with this Section.24(Source: P.A. 103-467, eff. 1-1-24.)